Florida, session 2026, SB42.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 39 40 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2), paragraph (a) 41 of subsection (5), paragraph (a) of subsection (9), and 42 paragraph (c) of subsection (14) of section 39.301, Florida 43 Statutes, are amended to read: 44 39.301âInitiation of protective investigations.â 45 (2)(a)âThe department shall immediately forward allegations 46 of criminal conduct to the municipal or county law enforcement 47 agency of the municipality or county in which the alleged 48 conduct has occurred. However, the department may delay 49 forwarding allegations of criminal conduct to the appropriate 50 law enforcement agency if the parent or legal custodian: 51 1.âHas alleged that the child has a preexisting medical 52 diagnosis specified in s. 39.303(4); or 53 2.âIs requesting that the child have a medical examination 54 under s. 39.304(1)(c). 55 56 Allegations of criminal conduct which are not immediately 57 forwarded to the law enforcement agency pursuant to subparagraph 58 1. or subparagraph 2. must be immediately forwarded to the law 59 enforcement agency upon completion of the investigation under 60 this part if criminal conduct is still alleged. 61 (5)(a)âUpon commencing an investigation under this part, 62 the child protective investigator shall inform any subject of 63 the investigation of the following: 64 1.âThe names of the investigators and identifying 65 credentials from the department. 66 2.âThe purpose of the investigation. 67 3.âThe right to obtain his or her own attorney and ways 68 that the information provided by the subject may be used. 69 4.âThe possible outcomes and services of the departmentâs 70 response. 71 5.âThe right of the parent or legal custodian to be engaged 72 to the fullest extent possible in determining the nature of the 73 allegation and the nature of any identified problem and the 74 remedy. 75 6.âThe duty of the parent or legal custodian to report any 76 change in the residence or location of the child to the 77 investigator and that the duty to report continues until the 78 investigation is closed. 79 7.âThe duty of the parent or legal custodian to immediately 80 report any preexisting medical diagnosis for the child specified 81 in s. 39.303(4) and to provide the name and contact information 82 of the licensed health care professional who made such diagnosis 83 or treated the child for the diagnosed condition to the 84 department within 10 days after being informed of such duty. 85 (9)(a)âFor each report received from the central abuse 86 hotline and accepted for investigation, the department shall 87 perform the following child protective investigation activities 88 to determine child safety: 89 1.âConduct a review of all relevant, available information 90 specific to the child, family, and alleged maltreatment; family 91 child welfare history; local, state, and federal criminal 92 records checks; and requests for law enforcement assistance 93 provided by the abuse hotline. Based on a review of available 94 information, including the allegations in the current report, a 95 determination must shall be made as to whether immediate 96 consultation should occur with law enforcement, the Child 97 Protection Team, a domestic violence shelter or advocate, or a 98 substance abuse or mental health professional. Such 99 consultations should include discussion as to whether a joint 100 response is necessary and feasible. A determination must shall 101 be made as to whether the person making the report should be 102 contacted before the face-to-face interviews with the child and 103 family members. 104 2.âConduct face-to-face interviews with the child; other 105 siblings, if any; and the parents, legal custodians, or 106 caregivers. 107 3.âAssess the childâs residence, including a determination 108 of the composition of the family and household, including the 109 name, address, date of birth, social security number, sex, and 110 race of each child named in the report; any siblings or other 111 children in the same household or in the care of the same 112 adults; the parents, legal custodians, or caregivers; and any 113 other adults in the same household. 114 4.âDetermine whether there is any indication that any child 115 in the family or household has been abused, abandoned, or 116 neglected; the nature and extent of present or prior injuries, 117 abuse, or neglect, and any evidence thereof; and a determination 118 as to the person or persons apparently responsible for the 119 abuse, abandonment, or neglect, including the name, address, 120 date of birth, social security number, sex, and race of each 121 such person. 122 5.âComplete assessment of immediate child safety for each 123 child based on available records, interviews, and observations 124 with all persons named in subparagraph 2. and appropriate 125 collateral contacts, which may include other professionals, and 126 continually assess the childâs safety throughout the 127 investigation. The departmentâs child protection investigators 128 are hereby designated a criminal justice agency for the purpose 129 of accessing criminal justice information to be used for 130 enforcing this stateâs laws concerning the crimes of child 131 abuse, abandonment, and neglect. This information must shall be 132 used solely for purposes supporting the detection, apprehension, 133 prosecution, pretrial release, posttrial release, or 134 rehabilitation of criminal offenders or persons accused of the 135 crimes of child abuse, abandonment, or neglect and may not be 136 further disseminated or used for any other purpose. 137 6.âFor a child who has a preexisting medical diagnosis 138 specified in s. 39.303(4), as reported by the parent or legal 139 custodian of the child, request the relevant medical records 140 from the licensed health care professional who diagnosed or 141 treated the child for such medical diagnosis. 142 7.6.âDocument the present and impending dangers to each 143 child based on the identification of inadequate protective 144 capacity through utilization of a standardized safety assessment 145 instrument. If present or impending danger is identified, the 146 child protective investigator must implement a safety plan or 147 take the child into custody. If present danger is identified and 148 the child is not removed, the child protective investigator must 149 shall create and implement a safety plan before leaving the home 150 or the location where there is present danger. If impending 151 danger is identified, the child protective investigator must 152 shall create and implement a safety plan as soon as necessary to 153 protect the safety of the child. The child protective 154 investigator may modify the safety plan if he or she identifies 155 additional impending danger. 156 a.âIf the child protective investigator implements a safety 157 plan, the plan must be specific, sufficient, feasible, and 158 sustainable in response to the realities of the present or 159 impending danger. A safety plan may be an in-home plan or an 160 out-of-home plan, or a combination of both. A safety plan may 161 include tasks or responsibilities for a parent, caregiver, or 162 legal custodian. However, a safety plan may not rely on 163 promissory commitments by the parent, caregiver, or legal 164 custodian who is currently not able to protect the child or on 165 services that are not available or will not result in the safety 166 of the child. A safety plan may not be implemented if for any 167 reason the parents, guardian, or legal custodian lacks the 168 capacity or ability to comply with the plan. If the department 169 is not able to develop a plan that is specific, sufficient, 170 feasible, and sustainable, the department must shall file a 171 shelter petition. A child protective investigator must shall 172 implement separate safety plans for the perpetrator of domestic 173 violence, if the investigator, using reasonable efforts, can 174 locate the perpetrator to implement a safety plan, and for the 175 parent who is a victim of domestic violence as defined in s. 176 741.28. Reasonable efforts to locate a perpetrator include, but 177 are not limited to, a diligent search pursuant to the same 178 requirements as in s. 39.503. If the perpetrator of domestic 179 violence is not the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of any 180 child in the home and if the department does not intend to file 181 a shelter petition or dependency petition that will assert 182 allegations against the perpetrator as a parent of a child in 183 the home, the child protective investigator must shall seek 184 issuance of an injunction authorized by s. 39.504 to implement a 185 safety plan for the perpetrator and impose any other conditions 186 to protect the child. The safety plan for the parent who is a 187 victim of domestic violence may not be shared with the 188 perpetrator. If any party to a safety plan fails to comply with 189 the safety plan resulting in the child being unsafe, the 190 department must shall file a shelter petition. 191 b.âThe child protective investigator shall collaborate with 192 the community-based care lead agency in the development of the 193 safety plan as necessary to ensure that the safety plan is 194 specific, sufficient, feasible, and sustainable. The child 195 protective investigator shall identify services necessary for 196 the successful implementation of the safety plan. The child 197 protective investigator and the community-based care lead agency 198 shall mobilize service resources to assist all parties in 199 complying with the safety plan. The community-based care lead 200 agency shall prioritize safety plan services to families who 201 have multiple risk factors, including, but not limited to, two 202 or more of the following: 203 (I)âThe parent or legal custodian is of young age; 204 (II)âThe parent or legal custodian, or an adult currently 205 living in or frequently visiting the home, has a history of 206 substance abuse, mental illness, or domestic violence; 207 (III)âThe parent or legal custodian, or an adult currently 208 living in or frequently visiting the home, has been previously 209 found to have physically or sexually abused a child; 210 (IV)âThe parent or legal custodian, or an adult currently 211 living in or frequently visiting the home, has been the subject 212 of multiple allegations by reputable reports of abuse or 213 neglect; 214 (V)âThe child is physically or developmentally disabled; or 215 (VI)âThe child is 3 years of age or younger. 216 c.âThe child protective investigator shall monitor the 217 implementation of the plan to ensure the childâs safety until 218 the case is transferred to the lead agency at which time the 219 lead agency shall monitor the implementation. 220 d.âThe department may file a petition for shelter or 221 dependency without a new child protective investigation or the 222 concurrence of the child protective investigator if the child is 223 unsafe but for the use of a safety plan and the parent or 224 caregiver has not sufficiently increased protective capacities 225 within 90 days after the transfer of the safety plan to the lead 226 agency. 227 (14) 228 (c)âThe department, in consultation with the judiciary, 229 shall adopt by rule: 230 1.âCriteria that are factors requiring that the department 231 take the child into custody, petition the court as provided in 232 this chapter, or, if the child is not taken into custody or a 233 petition is not filed with the court, conduct an administrative 234 review. Such factors must include, but are not limited to, 235 noncompliance with a safety plan or the case plan developed by 236 the department, and the family under this chapter, and prior 237 abuse reports with findings that involve the child, the childâs 238 sibling, or the childâs caregiver. 239 2.âRequirements that if after an administrative review the 240 department determines not to take the child into custody or 241 petition the court, the department must shall document the 242 reason for its decision in writing and include it in the 243 investigative file. For all cases that were accepted by the 244 local law enforcement agency for criminal investigation pursuant 245 to subsection (2), the department must include in the file 246 written documentation that the administrative review included 247 input from law enforcement. In addition, for all cases that must 248 be referred to Child Protection Teams pursuant to s. 39.303(5) 249 and (6) s. 39.303(4) and (5), the file must include written 250 documentation that the administrative review included the 251 results of the teamâs evaluation. 252 Section 2.âPresent subsections (4) through (10) of section 253 39.303, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 254 through (11), respectively, a new subsection (4) is added to 255 that section, and present subsections (5) and (6) of that 256 section are amended, to read: 257 39.303âChild Protection Teams and sexual abuse treatment 258 programs; services; eligible cases.â 259 (4)âA Child Protection Team shall consult with a physician 260 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 or an advanced 261 practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 464 who has 262 experience treating children with the medical conditions 263 specified in this subsection when evaluating a child with a 264 reported preexisting medical diagnosis of any of the following: 265 (a)âRickets. 266 (b)âEhlers-Danlos syndrome. 267 (c)âOsteogenesis imperfecta. 268 (d)âVitamin D deficiency. 269 (6)(5)âAll abuse and neglect cases transmitted for 270 investigation to a circuit by the hotline must be simultaneously 271 transmitted to the Child Protection Team for review. For the 272 purpose of determining whether a face-to-face medical evaluation 273 by a Child Protection Team is necessary, all cases transmitted 274 to the Child Protection Team which meet the criteria in 275 subsection (5) (4) must be timely reviewed by: 276 (a)âA physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 277 who holds board certification in pediatrics and is a member of a 278 Child Protection Team; 279 (b)âA physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 280 who holds board certification in a specialty other than 281 pediatrics, who may complete the review only when working under 282 the direction of the Child Protection Team medical director or a 283 physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 who holds 284 board certification in pediatrics and is a member of a Child 285 Protection Team; 286 (c)âAn advanced practice registered nurse licensed under 287 chapter 464 who has a specialty in pediatrics or family medicine 288 and is a member of a Child Protection Team; 289 (d)âA physician assistant licensed under chapter 458 or 290 chapter 459, who may complete the review only when working under 291 the supervision of the Child Protection Team medical director or 292 a physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 who holds 293 board certification in pediatrics and is a member of a Child 294 Protection Team; or 295 (e)âA registered nurse licensed under chapter 464, who may 296 complete the review only when working under the direct 297 supervision of the Child Protection Team medical director or a 298 physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 who holds 299 board certification in pediatrics and is a member of a Child 300 Protection Team. 301 (7)(6)âA face-to-face medical evaluation by a Child 302 Protection Team is not necessary when: 303 (a)âThe child was examined for the alleged abuse or neglect 304 by a physician who is not a member of the Child Protection Team, 305 and a consultation between the Child Protection Team medical 306 director or a Child Protection Team board-certified 307 pediatrician, advanced practice registered nurse, physician 308 assistant working under the supervision of a Child Protection 309 Team medical director or a Child Protection Team board-certified 310 pediatrician, or registered nurse working under the direct 311 supervision of a Child Protection Team medical director or a 312 Child Protection Team board-certified pediatrician, and the 313 examining physician concludes that a further medical evaluation 314 is unnecessary; 315 (b)âThe child protective investigator, with supervisory 316 approval, has determined, after conducting a child safety 317 assessment, that there are no indications of injuries as 318 described in paragraphs (5)(a)-(h) (4)(a)-(h) as reported; or 319 (c)âThe Child Protection Team medical director or a Child 320 Protection Team board-certified pediatrician, as authorized in 321 subsection (6) (5), determines that a medical evaluation is not 322 required. 323 324 Notwithstanding paragraphs (a), (b), and (c), a Child Protection 325 Team medical director or a Child Protection Team pediatrician, 326 as authorized in subsection (6) (5), may determine that a face 327 to-face medical evaluation is necessary. 328 Section 3.âParagraphs (c), (d), and (e) are added to 329 subsection (1) of section 39.304, Florida Statutes, to read: 330 39.304âPhotographs, medical examinations, X rays, and 331 medical treatment of abused, abandoned, or neglected child.â 332 (1)â 333 (c)âIf a medical examination is performed on a child under 334 paragraph (b), other than a medical examination for purposes of 335 determining whether a child has been sexually abused, the parent 336 or legal custodian of the child who is the subject of a 337 protective investigation or shelter order may request of the 338 department, no later than 10 days after such medical 339 examination, that the child be examined by: 340 1.âA Child Protection Team if the medical examination under 341 paragraph (b) was not performed by a Child Protection Team; 342 2.âA physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 or 343 an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 464 344 of the parentâs or legal custodianâs choosing who routinely 345 provides medical care to pediatric patients, if the medical 346 examination under paragraph (b) was performed by a Child 347 Protection Team, for the purpose of obtaining a second opinion 348 on diagnosis or treatment; or 349 3.âA physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 or 350 an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 464 351 of the parentâs or legal custodianâs choosing who routinely 352 provides diagnosis of and medical care to pediatric patients for 353 the conditions specified in s. 39.303(4) to consider a 354 differential diagnosis. 355 356 The cost of a medical examination under subparagraph 2. or 357 subparagraph 3. must be borne by the parent or legal custodian, 358 including through his or her health care coverage, if 359 applicable. 360 (d)âNotwithstanding s. 39.202(6), for all medical 361 examinations performed pursuant to paragraph (c), the physician 362 or advanced practice registered nurse must submit within 10 days 363 after the medical examination a written report that details the 364 findings and conclusions of the medical examination to the 365 department and the parent or legal custodian. 366 (e)âIf the findings and conclusions of the medical 367 examination conducted under paragraph (b) and the medical 368 examination conducted under paragraph (c) differ, the department 369 must immediately convene a case staffing to reach a consensus 370 regarding the differences in the medical opinions. The case 371 staffing must include the child protective investigator, the 372 investigatorâs supervisor, legal staff of the department, 373 representatives from a Child Protection Team, and the community 374 based care lead agency. If possible, the case staffing must also 375 include any health care practitioners who previously treated the 376 child, any health care practitioners who are currently treating 377 the child, and the physician or advanced practice registered 378 nurse who conducted the medical examination under paragraph (c). 379 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 380 456.057, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 381 456.057âOwnership and control of patient records; report or 382 copies of records to be furnished; disclosure of information.â 383 (7)(a)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and in 384 s. 440.13(4)(c), such records may not be furnished to, and the 385 medical condition of a patient may not be discussed with, any 386 person other than the patient, the patientâs legal 387 representative, or other health care practitioners and providers 388 involved in the patientâs care or treatment, except upon written 389 authorization from the patient. However, such records may be 390 furnished without written authorization under the following 391 circumstances: 392 1.âTo any person, firm, or corporation that has procured or 393 furnished such care or treatment with the patientâs consent. 394 2.âWhen compulsory physical examination is made pursuant to 395 Rule 1.360, Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, in which case 396 copies of the medical records shall be furnished to both the 397 defendant and the plaintiff. 398 3.âIn any civil or criminal action, unless otherwise 399 prohibited by law, upon the issuance of a subpoena from a court 400 of competent jurisdiction and proper notice to the patient or 401 the patientâs legal representative by the party seeking such 402 records. 403 4.âFor statistical and scientific research, provided the 404 information is abstracted in such a way as to protect the 405 identity of the patient or provided written permission is 406 received from the patient or the patientâs legal representative. 407 5.âTo a regional poison control center for purposes of 408 treating a poison episode under evaluation, case management of 409 poison cases, or compliance with data collection and reporting 410 requirements of s. 395.1027 and the professional organization 411 that certifies poison control centers in accordance with federal 412 law. 413 6.âTo the Department of Children and Families, its agent, 414 or its contracted entity, for the purpose of investigations of 415 or services for cases of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of 416 children or vulnerable adults. Records requested by the 417 Department of Children and Families pursuant to s. 39.301(9)(a) 418 must be furnished to the Department of Children and Families 419 within 14 days after such request. 420 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.